North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150B. Administrative Procedure Act.
Article 2A. Rules.
§ 150B-21.1.
Procedure for adopting a temporary rule.

Adoption. — An agency may adopt a temporary rule when it finds that adherence to the notice and hearing requirements of

G.S. 150B-21.2

would be contrary to the public interest and that the immediate adoption of the rule is required by one or more of the following:

A serious and unforeseen threat to the public health, safety, or welfare.

The effective date of a recent act of the General Assembly or the United States Congress.

A recent change in federal or State budgetary policy.

A recent federal regulation.

A recent court order.

The need for a rule establishing review criteria as authorized by G.S. 131E-183(b) to complement or be made consistent with the State Medical Facilities Plan approved by the Governor, if the rule addresses a matter included in the State Medical Facilities Plan, and the proposed rule and a notice of public hearing is submitted to the Codifier of Rules prior to the effective date of the Plan.

The need for the Wildlife Resources Commission to establish any of the following:

No wake zones.

Hunting or fishing seasons, including provisions for manner of take or any other conditions required for the implementation of such season.

Hunting or fishing bag limits.

Management of public game lands as defined in G.S. 113-129(8a).

The need for the Secretary of State to implement the certification technology provisions of Article 11A of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes, to adopt uniform Statements of Policy that have been officially adopted by the North American Securities Administrators Association, Inc., for the purpose of promoting uniformity of state securities regulation, and to adopt rules governing the conduct of hearings pursuant to this Chapter.

The need for the Commissioner of Insurance to implement the provisions of

G.S. 58-2-205

.

The need for the State Chief Information Officer to implement the information technology procurement provisions of Article 15 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.

The need for the State Board of Elections to adopt a temporary rule after prior notice or hearing or upon any abbreviated notice or hearing the agency finds practical for one or more of the following:

In accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 163-22.2

.

To implement any provisions of state or federal law for which the State Board of Elections has been authorized to adopt rules.

The need for the rule to become effective immediately in order to preserve the integrity of upcoming elections and the elections process.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-264, s. 22, effective October 1, 2015.

, (14) Reserved.

(15)

Expired pursuant to Session Laws 2002-164, s. 5, effective October 1, 2004.

(16)

Expired pursuant to Session Laws 2003-184, s. 3, effective July 1, 2005.

(17)

To maximize receipt of federal funds for the Medicaid or NC Health Choice programs within existing State appropriations, to reduce Medicaid or NC Health Choice expenditures, and to reduce Medicaid and NC Health Choice fraud and abuse.

(a1)

Recodified as subdivision (a)(16) of this section by Session Laws 2004-156, s. 1.

(a2)

A recent act, change, regulation, or order as used in subdivisions (2) through (5) of subsection (a) of this section means an act, change, regulation, or order occurring or made effective no more than 210 days prior to the submission of a temporary rule to the Rules Review Commission. Upon written request of the agency, the Commission may waive the 210-day requirement upon consideration of the degree of public benefit, whether the agency had control over the circumstances that required the requested waiver, notice to and opposition by the public, the need for the waiver, and previous requests for waivers submitted by the agency.

(a3)

Unless otherwise provided by law, the agency shall:

(1)

At least 30 business days prior to adopting a temporary rule, submit the rule and a notice of public hearing to the Codifier of Rules, and the Codifier of Rules shall publish the proposed temporary rule and the notice of public hearing on the Internet to be posted within five business days.

(2)

At least 30 business days prior to adopting a temporary rule, notify persons on the mailing list maintained pursuant to

G.S. 150B-21.2

(d) and any other interested parties of its intent to adopt a temporary rule and of the public hearing.

(3)

Accept written comments on the proposed temporary rule for at least 15 business days prior to adoption of the temporary rule.

(4)

Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed temporary rule no less than five days after the rule and notice have been published. If notice of a public hearing has been published and that public hearing has been cancelled, the agency shall publish notice at least five days prior to the date of any rescheduled hearing.

(a4)

An agency must also prepare a written statement of its findings of need for a temporary rule stating why adherence to the notice and hearing requirements in G.S. 150B-21.2 would be contrary to the public interest and why the immediate adoption of the rule is required. If the temporary rule establishes a new fee or increases an existing fee, the agency shall include in the written statement that it has complied with the requirements of

G.S. 12-3.1

. The statement must be signed by the head of the agency adopting the temporary rule.

Review. — When an agency adopts a temporary rule it must submit the rule and the agency’s written statement of its findings of the need for the rule to the Rules Review Commission. Within 15 business days after receiving the proposed temporary rule, the Commission shall review the agency’s written statement of findings of need for the rule and the rule to determine whether the statement meets the criteria listed in subsection (a) of this section and the rule meets the standards in

G.S. 150B-21.9

. The Commission shall direct a member of its staff who is an attorney licensed to practice law in North Carolina to review the statement of findings of need and the rule. The staff member shall make a recommendation to the Commission, which must be approved by the Commission or its designee. The Commission’s designee shall be a panel of at least three members of the Commission. In reviewing the statement, the Commission or its designee may consider any information submitted by the agency or another person. If the Commission or its designee finds that the statement meets the criteria listed in subsection (a) of this section and the rule meets the standards in

G.S. 150B-21.9

, the Commission or its designee must approve the temporary rule and deliver the rule to the Codifier of Rules within two business days of approval. The Codifier of Rules must enter the rule into the North Carolina Administrative Code on the sixth business day following receipt from the Commission or its designee.

(b1)

If the Commission or its designee finds that the statement does not meet the criteria listed in subsection (a) of this section or that the rule does not meet the standards in G.S. 150B-21.9, the Commission or its designee must immediately notify the head of the agency. The agency may supplement its statement of need with additional findings or submit a new statement. If the agency provides additional findings or submits a new statement, the Commission or its designee must review the additional findings or new statement within five business days after the agency submits the additional findings or new statement. If the Commission or its designee again finds that the statement does not meet the criteria listed in subsection (a) of this section or that the rule does not meet the standards in G.S. 150B-21.9, the Commission or its designee must immediately notify the head of the agency and return the rule to the agency.

(b2)

If an agency decides not to provide additional findings or submit a new statement when notified by the Commission or its designee that the agency’s findings of need for a rule do not meet the required criteria or that the rule does not meet the required standards, the agency must notify the Commission or its designee of its decision. The Commission or its designee shall then return the rule to the agency. When the Commission returns a rule to an agency in accordance with this subsection, the agency may file an action for declaratory judgment in Wake County Superior Court pursuant to Article 26 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

(b3)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if the agency has not complied with the provisions of

G.S. 12-3.1

, the Codifier of Rules shall not enter the rule into the Code.

Standing. — A person aggrieved by a temporary rule adopted by an agency may file an action for declaratory judgment in Wake County Superior Court pursuant to Article 26 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. In the action, the court shall determine whether the agency’s written statement of findings of need for the rule meets the criteria listed in subsection (a) of this section and whether the rule meets the standards in

G.S. 150B-21.9

. The court shall not grant an ex parte temporary restraining order.

(c1)

Filing a petition for rule making or a request for a declaratory ruling with the agency that adopted the rule is not a prerequisite to filing an action under this subsection. A person who files an action for declaratory judgment under this subsection must serve a copy of the complaint on the agency that adopted the rule being contested, the Codifier of Rules, and the Commission.

Effective Date and Expiration. — A temporary rule becomes effective on the date specified in

G.S. 150B-21.3

. A temporary rule expires on the earliest of the following dates:

The date specified in the rule.

The effective date of the permanent rule adopted to replace the temporary rule, if the Commission approves the permanent rule.

The date the Commission returns to an agency a permanent rule the agency adopted to replace the temporary rule.

The effective date of an act of the General Assembly that specifically disapproves a permanent rule adopted to replace the temporary rule.

270 days from the date the temporary rule was published in the North Carolina Register, unless the permanent rule adopted to replace the temporary rule has been submitted to the Commission.

Publication. — When the Codifier of Rules enters a temporary rule in the North Carolina Administrative Code, the Codifier must publish the rule in the North Carolina Register.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1981, c. 688, s. 12; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1232, s. 1; 1983, c. 857; c. 927, ss. 4, 8; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(1), 1(8); 1987, c. 285, ss. 10-12; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 149; 1993, c. 553, s. 54; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(c); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, ss. 7.10(c), (d); 1997-403, ss. 1-3; 1998-127, s. 2; 1998-212, s. 26B(h); 1999-434, s. 16; 1999-453, s. 5(a); 2000-69, ss. 3, 5; 2000-148, ss. 4, 5; 2001-126, s. 12; 2001-421, ss. 2.3, 5.3; 2001-424, ss. 27.17(b), (c), 27.22(a), (b); 2001-487, s. 21(g); 2002-97, ss. 2, 3; 2002-164, s. 4.6; 2003-184, s. 3; 2003-229, s. 2; 2003-413, ss. 27, 29; 2004-156, s. 1; 2011-398, s. 4; 2013-360, s. 12H.9(d); 2013-413, s. 39; 2015-241, s. 7A.4(ee); 2015-264, s. 22; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1; 2020-3, s. 4.25(a).

Cross References.

As to Commission’s ability to adopt temporary rules, notwithstanding this section, to establish maximum mass loads or concentration limits relating to nitrogen and phosphorous discharge limits pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.1

B, see

G.S. 143-215.1

B(c).

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes, in subdivision (a)(11), substituted “ G.S. 163A-742” for “

G.S. 163-22.2

” once, and substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” twice.

Session Laws
2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in
subdivision (a)(11).

Session Laws
1998-221, s. 2.1 provided: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(a) and 26 NCAC 2C.0102(11), the Coastal Resources Commission may adopt temporary rules governing coastal energy facilities until 1 July 2005.”

Session Laws
1998-165, s. 2 provides that the Soil and Water Conservation Commission may adopt temporary rules to implement the Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program. This section shall constitute a recent act of the General Assembly for purposes of
G.S. 150B-21.1(a)(2).

Session Laws
1998-212, s. 12.35C(b) provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 150B-21.1

, the Secretary may adopt temporary rules to implement subsection (a) of this section [which amended
G.S. 122C-112(a)], provided that the temporary rules shall not become effective until 60 days after the Secretary has provided notice and opportunity for written comment to the general public of the Secretary’s intent to adopt temporary rules, the purpose and subject matter of the rules, and the effective date of the rules. Notice and comment shall be through publication in the North Carolina Register, in the print media, and through mailings to area mental health authorities and other appropriate mental health institutions and providers that will be subject to the temporary rules.”

Session Laws
1999-463, s. 4 authorizes every State agency to adopt temporary rules necessary to implement the provisions of the act, the Hurricane Floyd Recovery Act of 1999, and provides that notwithstanding § 150B-21.1 (a)(2) and
26 NCAC 2C.0102(11), the authority to adopt temporary rules to implement the provisions of the act shall continue in effect until all rules necessary to implement the provisions of the act have become effective as either temporary rules or permanent rules. Notwithstanding § 150B-21.1 (d), a temporary rule adopted to implement the provisions of the act shall specify the date on which the rule will expire and shall continue in effect until that date. Any agency that adopts a temporary rule to implement the provisions of the act shall report the text of the rule and the agency’s written statement of its findings of the need for the rule to the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee within 30 days of the adoption of the temporary rule. Section 4 applies to the adoption of temporary rules by the Department of Administration under § 113A-11 (a) and to the adoption of temporary rules that establish minimum criteria by any State agency, as defined in § 113A-9, under § 113A-11 (b).

Session Laws
2000-50, s. 2, provides:
“Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(a), the Medical Care Commission shall adopt temporary rules for the purpose of defining the circumstances under which adult care homes may admit residents on a short-term basis for the purpose of caregiver respite and the rules that shall apply during the course of their stay. The Commission’s authority to adopt temporary rules under this section expires on the date that permanent rules pertaining to the same subject matter adopted by the Commission as authorized under
G.S. 143B-165(10) become effective.”

Session Laws
2000-55, s. 6, provides:
“Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(a), the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall adopt temporary rules to implement
G.S. 122C-26(5).”

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 21.5, provides that, notwithstanding the provisions of
G.S. 150B-21.1(a), the Department of Administration may adopt temporary rules to approve abuser treatment programs that apply to the North Carolina Council for Women.

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 1.1, provides:
“This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2000.’ ”

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 28.2, provides:
“Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2000-2001 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2000-2001 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 28.4, contains a severability clause.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 10.35B, provides: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(b) and
G.S. 150B-21.3(b2), the Department of Health and Human Services may adopt as temporary rules the rules governing residential treatment for children or adolescents approved for adoption or revision on May 18, 2005, by the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and approved by the Rules Review Commission. The temporary rules shall become effective as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(a).”

Session Laws
2001-113, ss. 1 to 4, provide: “For a well serving a single-family dwelling where lot size or other fixed conditions preclude the separation distances specified in subparagraph (a) (2) of
15A NCAC 2C.0107 (Standards of Construction: Water-Supply Wells), as adopted by the Environmental Management Commission on October 12, 2000, and approved by the Rules Review Commission on November 16, 2000, the required separation distances shall be the maximum possible, but shall in no case be less than the following:

“(1) Septic tank and drainfield
50 feet

“(2) Water-tight sewage or liquid-waste collection or transfer facility
25 feet

“(3) Animal barns
50 feet

“(4) Cesspool or privies
50 feet.

“This act [Session Laws 2001-113] constitutes a recent act of the General Assembly within the meaning of
G.S. 150B-21.1(a). The Environmental Management Commission may adopt a temporary rule that incorporates the provisions of Section 1 of this act [Section 1 of Session Laws 2001-113]. Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(d), a temporary rule adopted in accordance with this section shall remain in effect until a permanent rule adopted to replace the temporary rule becomes effective.

“Except as provided by Section 1 of this act [Section 1 of Session Laws 2001-113], this act does not limit the authority of the Environmental Management Commission to adopt rules governing the location, construction, repair, and abandonment of wells pursuant to

G.S. 87-87

and Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

“This act is effective retroactively to the date on which it is ratified. If the Environmental Management Commission adopts a temporary rule as provided in Section 2 of this act, Section 1 of this act [Sections 1 and 2 of Session Laws 2001-113] expires when the temporary rule becomes effective.”

Session Laws
2000-134, s. 21, provides that Session Laws 2000-134, relating to air quality emission inspections, and fund expenditures, constitutes a recent act of the General Assembly within the meaning of

G.S. 150B-21.1

, and that, notwithstanding

G.S. 150B-21.1

(a)(2) and 26 NCAC 2C.0102(11), the Environmental Management Commission and the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation may adopt temporary rules to implement the provisions of the act. Section 21 is to continue in effect until all rules necessary to implement the provisions of the act have become effective as either temporary rules or permanent rules.

Session Laws
2001-355, s. 5(b) provides that the Environmental Management Commission may adopt a temporary rule that incorporates the provisions of Sections 2 and 3 of the act (providing for implementation of the Tar-Pamlico River Basin-Nutrient Sensitive Waters Management Strategy: Agricultural Nutrient Control Strategy, as adopted by the Environmental Management Commission on 12 October 2000 and approved by the Rules Review Commission on 20 November 2000, to become effective on 1 September 2001). Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(d), a temporary rule adopted in accordance with s. 5(b) shall remain in effect until a temporary or permanent rule adopted to replace the temporary rule becomes effective.

Session Laws
2001-418, s. 4(a), as amended by Session Laws
2003-340, s. 5, provides: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(d), temporary rules
15A NCAC 2B.0243 and
15A NCAC 2B.0244, which were adopted pursuant to Section 7.1 of S.L. 1999-329 and which became effective on or before 1 July 2001, shall continue in effect until 1 September 2004 in order to provide sufficient time for the Environmental Management Commission to further consult with businesses and industries, local governments, landowners, and other interested or potentially affected persons in the upper and lower Catawba River Basin as to the appropriate scope of permanent rules to protect water quality and riparian buffers in that river basin.
In developing permanent rules, the Commission shall consider whether riparian buffers on the main stem of the Catawba River and on lake shorelines are adequate to protect water quality in the river and whether riparian buffer protection requirements should or should not be extended to some or all of the tributary streams in the river basin, taking into account the sources of water quality degradation in the river, the topography of the land in the river basin, and other relevant factors.”

Session Laws
2001-418, s. 4(b), provides: “Vested rights recognized or established under the common law or by
G.S. 153A-344(b),
153A-344.1,
160A-385(b), or
160A-385.1 shall include the right, as provided in this subsection, to undertake and complete development in the Catawba River Basin without application of temporary rule
15A NCAC 2B.0243. The Commission and the Department shall not apply temporary rule
15A NCAC 2B.0243 to development with vested rights recognized or established under
G.S. 153A-344(b),
153A-344.1,
160A-385(b), or
160A-385.1 prior to 1 July 2001. The Commission and the Department shall not apply temporary rule
15A NCAC 2B.0243 to development with vested rights recognized or established under the common law prior to the date this section [s. 4 of Session Laws 2001-418] becomes effective if the Commission has issued a certification pursuant to
G.S. 143B-282(a)(1)u. prior to 1 July 2001. The Commission shall not adopt or enforce rules that confer or restrict a vested right to undertake or complete development. It is the intent of the General Assembly that this subsection [s. 4(b)] apply only to the particular circumstances that are the subject of this section [s. 4 of Session Laws 2001-418]. This subsection [s. 4(b)] does not establish a precedent as to the application of vesting under a zoning or land-use planning program administered by a local government or to any other environmental program.”

Session Laws
2001-416, s. 4(c), provides: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.3(a), this section [s. 4 of Session Laws 2001-416] shall not be construed to authorize the adoption of additional temporary rules related to protection of water quality and riparian buffers.”

Session Laws
2003-284, s. 10.19(a)(22), as amended by Session Laws
2004-124, s. 10.4, contains provisions regarding the following services and payment bases: 1) services as defined by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS); and 2) for children eligible for certain EPSDT services; and 3) certain services for Medicaid-eligible adults. The subdivision further provides: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(a), the Department of Health and Human Services may adopt temporary rules in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes further defining the qualifications of providers and referral procedures in order to implement this subdivision. Coverage policy for services defined by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services under sub-subdivisions a. and b.2 of this subdivision shall be established by the Division of Medical Assistance.”

Session Laws
2001-424, ss. 30.3(a) to (e), provide:

“(a) The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish a committee to develop and recommend to the Board a core series of employability skills training classes that should be coded in the Continuing Education Master Course List as Human Resources Development.

“(b) The State Board of Community Colleges may waive tuition and fees for enrollment in classes coded in the Continuing Education Master Course List as Human Resources Development if the individual enrolling:

“(1) Is unemployed;

“(2)
Has received notification of a pending layoff;

“(3) Is working and is eligible for the Federal Earned Income Tax Credit (FEITC); or

“(4)
Is working and earning wages at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty guidelines.

“Individuals for whom tuition and fees are waived must sign a form adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges verifying that they meet one of these criteria.

“(c) The State Board of Community Colleges shall study the feasibility of integrating the delivery of human resources development services into the frame work of the JobLink Career Centers.
The Board shall report its recommendations to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by May 1, 2002.

“(d) The State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on its reorganization of the Human Resources Development Program by January 1, 2003.

“(e) The State Board of Community Colleges may adopt temporary rules to implement reorganization of the Human Resources Development Program.”

“Individuals for whom tuition and fees are waived must sign a form adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges verifying that they meet one of these criteria.

“(c) The State Board of Community Colleges shall study the feasibility of integrating the delivery of human resources development services into the frame work of the JobLink Career Centers.
The Board shall report its recommendations to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by May 1, 2002.

“(d) The State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on its reorganization of the Human Resources Development Program by January 1, 2003.

“(e) The State Board of Community Colleges may adopt temporary rules to implement reorganization of the Human Resources Development Program.”

Session Laws
2001-494, s. 3, provides: “The Coastal Resources Commission may adopt a temporary rule to amend
15A NCAC 7H.0209 that incorporates the provision of Section 1 of this act [s. 1 of Session Laws 2001-494, relating to the 30 foot buffer requirement along public trust and estuarine waters]. Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(d), a temporary rule adopted in accordance with this section [s. 1 of Session Laws 2001-494] shall remain in effect until the permanent rule that incorporates the temporary rule becomes effective. Notwithstanding
G.S. 150B-21.1(a)(2), this act [Session Laws 2001-494] shall not be construed to authorize the adoption of temporary rules except as specifically provided in this section [s. 1 of Session Laws 2001-494].”

Session Laws
2001-504, s. 19, provides: “This act constitutes a recent act of the General Assembly within the meaning of

G.S. 150B-21.1

. Notwithstanding

G.S. 150B-21.1

(a) (2) and 26 NCAC 2C.0102(11), the Environmental Management Commission and the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation may adopt temporary rules to implement the provisions of this act. This section [s. 19 of Session Laws 2001-504] shall continue in effect until all rules necessary to implement the provisions of this act have become effective as either temporary rules or permanent rules. ”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.31(d), as amended by Session Laws
2012-72, s. 8, provides: “Services and Payment Bases. — The Department shall spend funds appropriated for Medicaid services in accordance with the following schedule of services and payment bases. Unless otherwise provided, services and payment bases will be as prescribed in the State Plan as established by the Department of Health and Human Services and may be changed with the approval of the Director of the Budget.

“The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall operate and manage the Medicaid program within the annual State appropriation. DHHS shall establish policies, practices, rates, and expenditure procedures that are in compliance with CMS regulations and approved State Plans, State laws, and regulations.

“Additionally, the Department shall be required to use the Physician’s Advisory Group for review and will collaborate with other stakeholder groups in the adoption and implementation of all clinical and payment policies, including all public notice and posting provisions in use as of the effective date of this provision.

“(1) Mandatory Services. — In order to manage the Medicaid program within the annual State appropriation, the Secretary shall have the authority to submit State Plan amendments and establish temporary rules affecting the amount of service and payment rate for the following mandatory services:

“a. Hospital inpatient. — Payment for hospital inpatient services will be prescribed by the State Plan as established by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“b. Hospital outpatient. — Eighty percent (80%) of allowable costs or a prospective reimbursement plan as established by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“c. Nursing facilities. — Nursing facilities providing services to Medicaid recipients who also qualify for Medicare must be enrolled in the Medicare program as a condition of participation in the Medicaid program. State facilities are not subject to the requirement to enroll in the Medicare program. Residents of nursing facilities who are eligible for Medicare coverage of nursing facility services must be placed in a Medicare-certified bed. Medicaid shall cover facility services only after the appropriate services have been billed to Medicare.

“d. Physicians, certified nurse midwife services, nurse practitioners, physician assistants. — Fee schedules as developed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“e. EPSDT screens. — Payments in accordance with rate schedule developed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“f. Home health and related services, durable medical equipment. — Payments according to reimbursement plans developed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“g. Rural health clinical services. — Provider-based, reasonable cost, nonprovider-based, single-cost reimbursement rate per clinic visit.

“h. Family planning. — Negotiated rate for local health departments. For other providers see specific services, e.g., hospitals, physicians.

“i. Independent laboratory and X-ray services. — Uniform fee schedules as developed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“j. Medicare Buy-In. — Social Security Administration premium.

“k. Ambulance services. — Uniform fee schedules as developed by the Department of Health and Human Services. Public ambulance providers will be reimbursed at cost.

“l. Medicare crossover claims. — The Department shall apply Medicaid medical policy to Medicare claims for dually eligible recipients. The Department shall pay an amount up to the actual coinsurance or deductible or both, in accordance with the State Plan, as approved by the Department of Health and Human Services. The Department may disregard application of this policy in cases where application of the policy would adversely affect patient care.

“m. Pregnancy-related services. — Covered services for pregnant women shall include nutritional counseling, psychosocial counseling, and predelivery and postpartum home visits as described in clinical policy.

“n. Mental health services. — Coverage is limited to children eligible for EPSDT services provided by:

“1. Licensed or certified psychologists, licensed clinical social workers, licensed clinical social workers associates, certified clinical nurse specialists in psychiatric mental health advanced practice, nurse practitioners certified as clinical nurse specialists in psychiatric mental health advanced practice, licensed psychological associates, licensed professional counselors, licensed professional counselor associates, licensed marriage and family therapists, licensed marriage and family therapist associates, licensed clinical addictions specialists, licensed clinical addiction specialists associate, and certified clinical supervisors, when Medicaid-eligible children are referred by the Community Care of North Carolina primary care physician, a Medicaid-enrolled psychiatrist, or the area mental health program or local management entity, and

“2. Institutional providers of residential services as defined by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for children and Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility services that meet federal and State requirements as defined by the Department.

“(2) Optional Services. — In order to manage the Medicaid program within the annual State appropriation, the Secretary shall have the authority to submit State Plan amendments and establish temporary rules affecting the amount of service, payment rate, or elimination of the following optional services:

“a. Certified registered nurse anesthetists.

“b. Community Alternative Programs.

“c. Hearing aids. — Wholesale cost plus dispensing fee to provider.

“d. Ambulatory surgical centers.

“e. Private duty nursing, clinic services, prepaid health plans.

“f. Intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded.

“g. Chiropractors, podiatrists, optometrists, dentists.

“h. Dental coverage. — Dental services shall be provided on a restricted basis in accordance with criteria adopted by the Department to implement this subsection.

“i. Optical supplies. — Payment for materials is made to a contractor in accordance with
42 C.F.R. § 431.54(d). Fees paid to dispensing providers are negotiated fees established by the State agency based on industry charges.

“j. Physical therapy, occupational therapy, and speech therapy. — Services for adults. Payments are to be made only to qualified providers at rates negotiated by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“k. Personal care services. — Payment in accordance with the State Plan developed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“l. Case management services. — Reimbursement in accordance with the availability of funds to be transferred within the Department of Health and Human Services.

“m. Hospice and palliative care.

“n. Medically necessary prosthetics or orthotics. — In order to be eligible for reimbursement, providers must be licensed or certified by the occupational licensing board or the certification authority having authority over the provider’s license or certification. Medically necessary prosthetics and orthotics are subject to prior approval and utilization review.

“o. Health insurance premiums.

“p. Medical care/other remedial care. — Services not covered elsewhere in this section include related services in schools; health professional services provided outside the clinic setting to meet maternal and infant health goals.

“q. Bariatric surgeries. — Covered as described in clinical policy 1A-15, Surgery for Clinically Severe Obesity. In order to raise the standard of bariatric care in North Carolina, approval for these procedures shall be granted only to those providers (facilities and surgeons) who are designated as a Bariatric Surgery Center of Excellence (BSCOE) by the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery (ASMBS). Providers must then submit to NC Medicaid documentation of their designation as a BSCOE, as well as verify their continued annual participation.

“r. Drugs. —

“1. Reimbursements. — Reimbursements shall be available for prescription drugs as allowed by federal regulations plus a professional services fee per month, excluding refills for the same drug or generic equivalent during the same month. Payments for drugs are subject to the provisions of this subdivision or in accordance with the State Plan adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services, consistent with federal reimbursement regulations. Payment of the professional services fee shall be made in accordance with the State Plan adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services, consistent with federal reimbursement regulations. The professional services fee shall be established by the Department. In addition to the professional services fee, the Department may pay an enhanced fee for pharmacy services.

“2. Limitations on quantity. — The Department of Health and Human Services may establish authorizations, limitations, and reviews for specific drugs, drug classes, brands, or quantities in order to manage effectively the Medicaid program. The Department may impose prior authorization requirements on brand-name drugs for which the phrase ‘medically necessary’ is written on the prescription.

“3. Dispensing of generic drugs. — Notwithstanding
G.S. 90-85.27 through